Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.50.060

Notification to person named in report. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5143-S.SL) ***

(1) When a listing or a report of contributions is made to the commission under RCW 29B.50.050(2)(c), a copy of the listing or report must be given to the candidate, elected official, professional staff member of the legislature, or officer or employee of an agency, or a political committee supporting or opposing a ballot proposition named in the listing or report.

(2) If a state elected official or a member of the official's immediate family is identified by a lobbyist in a lobbyist report as having received from the lobbyist an item specified in RCW 42.52.150(5) or 42.52.010(9) (d) or (f), the lobbyist shall transmit to the official a copy of the completed form used to identify the item in the report at the same time the report is filed with the commission.

[ 2024 c 164 s 478; 2010 c 204 s 805; 1993 c 2 s 32 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.620, 42.17.172.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.